Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.32.040

Murder in the first degree—Sentence.

Notwithstanding RCW 9A.32.030(2), any person convicted of the crime of murder in the first degree shall be sentenced to life imprisonment.

[ 1982 c 10 s 2. Prior: (1) 1981 c 138 s 21; 1977 ex.s. c 206 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.32.040. (2) 1981 c 136 s 55 repealed by 1982 c 10 s 18.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 10: See note following RCW 6.13.080.

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.

Aggravated first degree murder: Chapter 10.95 RCW.